Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.130

County treasurer—Duties.

The county treasurer is hereby designated as the treasurer of all county road improvement districts created hereunder, and shall collect all road improvement district assessments, and the duties and responsibilities herein imposed upon him or her shall be among the duties and responsibilities of his or her office for which his or her bond is given as county treasurer.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4141; 1963 c 4 s 36.88.130. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 13.]